Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.060

Advisory committee—Composition—Terms—Duties.

(1) The secretary has the authority to appoint an advisory committee to further the purposes of this chapter. The secretary may consider the persons who are recommended for appointment by the orthotic and prosthetic associations of the state. The committee is composed of five members, one member initially appointed for a term of one year, two for a term of two years, and two for a term of three years. Subsequent appointments are for terms of three years. No person may serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms. Members of the advisory committee must be residents of this state. The committee is composed of three individuals licensed in the category designated and engaged in rendering services to the public. Two members must at all times be holders of licenses for the practice of either prosthetics or orthotics, or both, in this state, except for the initial members of the advisory committee, all of whom must fulfill the requirements for licensure under this chapter. One member must be a practicing orthotist. One member must be a practicing prosthetist. One member must be licensed by the state as a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, specializing in orthopedic medicine or surgery or physiatry. Two members must represent the public at large and be unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the profession being credentialed but, to the extent possible, be consumers of orthotic and prosthetic services. The two members appointed to the advisory committee representing the public at large must have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services and must not be or have been a licensee of a health occupation committee or an employee of a health facility, nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision of health services at any level of responsibility.

(2) The secretary may remove any member of the advisory committee for cause as specified by rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) The advisory committee may provide advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the secretary, such as applications for licenses.

(4) The advisory committee may be requested by the secretary to approve an examination required for licensure under this chapter.

(5) The advisory committee may be requested by the secretary to review and monitor the exemptions to requirements of certain orthoses and prostheses in this chapter and recommend to the secretary any statutory changes that may be needed to properly protect the public.

(6) The advisory committee, at the request of the secretary, may recommend rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, relating to standards for appropriateness of orthotic and prosthetic care.

(7) The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the secretary and hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the secretary. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A majority of the members currently serving constitute a quorum.

(8) Each member of an advisory committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committees shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of their committees.

(9) The secretary, members of advisory committees, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 2022 c 240 s 30; 1997 c 285 s 7.]